Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF340.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2398XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 340 Section 1. Section 331.653, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 65B. Carry out the duties imposed under 3 section 904.913. 4 Sec. 2. Section 664A.3, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 5 following new subsection: 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. A no-contact order issued pursuant 7 to this section shall specifically include notice that the 8 defendant may be required to be subject to an electronic 9 tracking and monitoring system while a no-contact order is 10 in effect under this section. The court shall advise the 11 defendant that in the event the defendant is brought before 12 the court on any subsequent allegation of violating the 13 no-contact order for which the court finds probable cause that 14 a violation occurred, the court will be required to impose a 15 requirement that the defendant be subject to an electronic 16 tracking and monitoring system as set forth in section 904.913. 17 The court shall additionally advise the defendant that the 18 costs associated with the electronic monitoring shall be the 19 responsibility of the defendant. 20 Sec. 3. Section 904.913, Code 2025, is amended by adding the 21 following new subsections: 22 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. A person brought before the court 23 on an allegation of violating a no-contact order issued under 24 section 664A.3, for which the court finds probable cause that 25 a violation occurred shall be required to be supervised by an 26 electronic tracking and monitoring system as set forth in this 27 section. 28 b. The court shall determine at initial appearance if 29 information is available regarding the protected partyâs 30 residence and place of employment for the purposes of 31 determining a protective zone. Information regarding the 32 protective zone shall be made available to the department and 33 the sheriffâs office of the county in which the no-contact 34 order was issued or the county in which the alleged violation 35 -1- LSB 2398XS (2) 91 as/js 1/ 4 S.F. 340 of a no-contact order occurred. 1 c. If the person is already subject to an existing 2 electronic tracking and monitoring system under this chapter, 3 the court is not required to impose a requirement for an 4 electronic tracking and monitoring system for additional 5 allegations of a violation of a no-contact order. 6 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. If the person is being supervised by 7 the department under this chapter or is assigned by the court 8 to supervision under this chapter as a condition of release, 9 the supervising agency shall place the person on an electronic 10 tracking and monitoring system. 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 5. If the person is not being supervised 12 by the department under this chapter, the court shall order 13 the person to report to the sheriffâs office of the county in 14 which the no-contact order was issued, or where the violation 15 occurred if outside of the county where the no-contact order 16 was issued, within twenty-four hours of release to be equipped 17 with an electronic tracking and monitoring system, which shall 18 be monitored by the sheriffâs office. The reporting and 19 equipping requirement can also be fulfilled at the county jail 20 where the person was held prior to release. 21 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Any electronic tracking and monitoring 22 system under this section shall provide for the monitoring of 23 a protective zone in or near the protected partyâs residence 24 and place of employment. For purposes of this section, a 25 âprotective zoneâ is any area within one thousand feet of a 26 protected partyâs residence or place of employment. 27 NEW SUBSECTION . 7. Any electronic tracking and monitoring 28 system imposed under this section shall provide for the 29 ability of the protected party to receive a contemporaneous 30 or immediate electronic alert when the defendant has entered 31 a protective zone. 32 NEW SUBSECTION . 8. Any electronic tracking and monitoring 33 system imposed under this section shall be monitored at all 34 times and shall have the capability to contemporaneously or 35 -2- LSB 2398XS (2) 91 as/js 2/ 4 S.F. 340 immediately alert the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction 1 over the protective zone and the protected party to any active 2 intrusion of the defendant into a protective zone or the 3 defendantâs presence within a protective zone. 4 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. Any costs associated with the electronic 5 tracking and monitoring system imposed under this section shall 6 be assessed to the defendant as court costs. 7